Utah statutes.
48-2e-408.   Reimbursement, indemnification, advancement, and insurance.

(1)  A limited partnership shall reimburse a general partner for any payment made by the general partner in the course of the general partner's activities on behalf of the limited partnership, if the general partner complied with Sections 48-2e-406, 48-2e-409, and 48-2e-504 in making the payment.

(2)  A limited partnership shall indemnify and hold harmless a person with respect to any claim or demand against the person and any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by the person by reason of the person's former or present capacity as a general partner, if the claim, demand, debt, obligation, or other liability does not arise from the person's breach of Section 48-2e-406, 48-2e-409, or 48-2e-504.

(3)  In the ordinary course of its activities and affairs, a limited partnership may advance reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees and costs, incurred by a person in connection with a claim or demand against the person by reason of the person's former or present capacity as a general partner, if the person promises to repay the limited partnership if the person ultimately is determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under Subsection (2).

(4)  A limited partnership may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a general partner against liability asserted against or incurred by the general partner in that capacity or arising from that status even if, under Subsection 48-2e-112(3)(h), the partnership agreement could not eliminate or limit the person's liability to the limited partnership for the conduct giving rise to the liability.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

